Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-909
Power plant; operation and extension; tax authorized.

The city council or village board of trustees of a city of the second class or village shall levy annually a sufficient tax to maintain, operate, and extend any power plant, electric or other light works as provided in section 17-906 and to provide for the payment of the interest on the principal of any bonds that may have been issued as provided in section 17-908.

Laws 1921, c. 192, § 1, p. 712;

C.S.1922, § 4394;

C.S.1929, § 17-601;

R.S.1943, § 17-909;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 245.